District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.48

Seal.

The Council of the District of Columbia shall, by resolution, adopt an official seal, which shall be judicially noted.

History

May 22, 1981, D.C. Law 4-3, § 2, 28 DCR 1422

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-235.